Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1086.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 49AIDENTIFICATION UPON REENTRYSec.49A01. Scope of chapter.49A02. Definitions.49A03. Establishment.49A04. Administration.49A05. Guidelines.49A06. Responsibilities of paying costs.49A07. Rules and regulations.§ 49A01. Scope of chapter.123456789101112131415161718 This chapter relates to the Identification Upon Reentry Program.§ 49A02. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Assist." Printing necessary forms, ensuring that an eligible offender has filled forms out correctly with sufficient information, facilitating communication between an eligible offender and State agencies and keeping an eligible offender updated on the developments of their case."Costs." Application fees and translation services and other goods or services that require a payment from an eligible offender."Eligible offender." An incarcerated individual who i s to be released from a State correctional institution and has decided to participate in the program."Program." The Identification Upon Reentry Program established under section 49A03 (relating to establishment).§ 49A03. Establishment.The department, in collaboration with the Department of Health and the Department of Transportation, shall establish the Identification Upon Reentry Program to provide eligible offenders with birth certificates, Social Security cards, photo identification cards and driver's licenses upon release from a State correctional institution.§ 49A04. Administration.The program shall be administered as follows:(1) The department, the Department of Health and the Department of Transportation shall establish policies 20250SB1086PN1295 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 necessary to carry out the program, including program requirements and implementation.(2) The department, the Department of Health and the Department of Transportation may seek Federal or State funding to support the program.(3) The department, the Department of Health and the Department of Transportation shall develop monitoring and accountability systems to confirm that the program is being efficiently carried out. The monitoring and accountability systems shall include the submission of an annual report to the Law and Justice Committee of the Senate and the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives. The annual report shall include the number and percentage of offenders released with birth certificates, photo identification cards and driver's licenses and the number and percentage of offenders released without such documents and the reasons why.§ 49A05. Guidelines.The following shall apply:(1) Prior to the release of an eligible offender, the department, in consultation with the Department of Transportation, shall assist an eligible offender in obtaining the following:(i) a photo identification card; or(ii) a driver's license.(2) Once an eligible offender is made aware of the eligible offender's ability to participate and available options under the program, the eligible offender may opt out of participation in the program.(3) The department, in consultation with the Department of Health and the Social Security Administration, shall 20250SB1086PN1295 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assist an eligible offender in obtaining the necessary documents, including a Social Security card and birth certificate, needed to apply for a driver's license or photo identification card.(4) If an eligible offender was born in another state or became a United States citizen or a naturalized citizen, the department shall assist the eligible offender in obtaining the necessary documents from the appropriate agencies to apply for a photo identification card or driver's license.(5) Upon application, the Department of Transportation, in cooperation with the department, shall issue a renewed or replacement driver's license to an eligible offender deemed eligible to drive. If an eligible offender's driver's license is expired or the eligible offender is in need of a replacement driver's license, the department, in cooperation with the Department of Transportation, shall assist the eligible offender with renewing the eligible offender's driver's license or requesting a replacement.(6) Upon application, the Department of Transportation, in cooperation with the department, shall issue a new, renewed or replacement photo identification card to an eligible offender.(7) If an eligible offender's driving privilege is under a term or indefinite suspension by the Department of Transportation, the department, in cooperation with the Department of Transportation, shall provide the offender with a restoration requirements letter and the department shall assist the eligible offender in applying for a photo identification card.(8) If an eligible offender's driver's license is 20250SB1086PN1295 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 expired or the eligible offender is in need of a replacement driver's license, the department, in cooperation with the Department of Transportation, shall assist the eligible offender with renewing the eligible offender's driver's license or requesting a replacement.(9) If an eligible offender's driving privilege cannot be reinstated prior to release, the department, in cooperation with the Department of Transportation, shall inform the eligible offender of the option to apply for an occupational limited license or a probationary license and provide information relating to occupational limited licenses and probationary licenses.§ 49A06. Responsibilities of paying costs.An eligible offender shall not be responsible for any costs associated with the provisions of this chapter.§ 49A07. Rules and regulations.The department, the Department of Health and the Department of Transportation may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this chapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1086PN1295 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920